Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1159.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 20-111, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE20-111. Health insurers; savings incentive programs; definitions A. A health insurer may shall establish a program that provides a savings incentive for enrollees for medically necessary covered health care services that health care providers and health care facilities provide at a price that is below the health insurer's usual reimbursement. B. The program may enable an eligible enrollee who receives covered health care services from a health care provider or health care facility at a price below the health insurer's usual reimbursement to have the amount the enrollee pays applied toward the enrollee's deductible and out-of-pocket maximum and be reimbursed for a portion fifty percent of the amount of the difference between the price the enrollee paid and the health insurer's usual reimbursement.  A health insurer may reimburse an eligible enrollee by doing either of the following: 1. Making a deposit into either: (a) A health savings account. (b) A 530A account as prescribed in 26 United States Code section 530A. 2. Providing the amount in cash. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Health care facility" means a hospital, outpatient surgical center, health care laboratory, diagnostic imaging center or urgent care center. 2. "Health care provider" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3216. 3. "Health insurer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3216. 4. "Usual reimbursement" means the amount the health insurer would ordinarily pay an in-network health care provider or an in-network health care facility for the service. END_STATUTE